Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Economic Opportunity Zone Act

154.23-005.
Legislative findings for KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares as follows:

That the general welfare and material well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth, particularly those residing in qualified zones, depends in large measure upon development and growth of manufacturing and service or technology industries in the Commonwealth;

It is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to create new sources of tax revenues for the support of public services, to induce the location and expansion of manufacturing and service or technology industries within qualified zones, and to advance the public purposes of relieving unemployment and providing employment opportunities that would not exist but for the inducements offered by the authority to eligible companies; and

That the authority granted by KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079 and purposes to be accomplished under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079 are proper governmental and public purposes for which public moneys may be expended, and the inducements for the location and expansion of manufacturing and service or technology industries within qualified zones is of paramount importance, for which KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079 shall be liberally construed and applied to advance public purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

154.23-010.
Definitions for KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079.

As used in KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.22-010;

“Approved company” means an eligible company that locates an economic development project in a qualified zone, as provided for in KRS 154.23-030;

“Approved costs” means:

For an approved company that establishes a new manufacturing facility or expands an existing manufacturing facility, the following obligations incurred in its economic development project, including rent under leases subject to subsection (8)(b)4. of this section:

The cost of labor, contractors, subcontractors, builders, and material workers in connection with the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of an economic development project;

The cost of acquiring real estate or rights in land and any cost incidental thereto, including recording fees;

The cost of contract bonds and insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of an economic development project that is not paid by the contractor or contractors or otherwise provided for;

The cost of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimates, plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as for the performance of all duties required by or consequent to the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of an economic development project;

All costs required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of an economic development project; and

All other costs of a nature comparable to those described above; or

For an approved company that establishes a new service or technology business or expands existing service or technology operations, up to a maximum of fifty percent (50%) of the total start-up costs during the term of the service and technology agreement, plus up to a maximum of fifty percent (50%) of the annual rent for each elapsed year of the service and technology agreement;

“Assessment” means the job development assessment fee authorized by KRS 154.23-055;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, as created in KRS 154.20-010;

“Average hourly wage” means the wage and employment data published by the Department of Workforce Investment within the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet collectively translated into wages per hour based on a two thousand eighty (2,080) hour work year for the following sectors:

Manufacturing;

Transportation, communications, and public utilities;

Wholesale and retail trade;

Finance, insurance, and real estate; and

Services;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Economic development project” or “project” means:

A new or expanded service or technology activity conducted at a new or expanded site by:

An approved company; or

An approved company and its affiliate or affiliates; or

Any of the following activities of an approved company engaged in manufacturing:

The acquisition of or present ownership in any real estate in a qualified zone for the purposes described in KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079, which ownership shall include only fee simple ownership of real estate and possession of real estate according to a capital lease as determined in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 13, Accounting for Leases, issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, November 1976;

The acquisition or present ownership of improvements or facilities on land that is possessed or is to be possessed by the approved company in a ground lease having a term of sixty (60) years or more; provided, however, that this project shall not include lease payments made under a ground lease for purposes of calculating the tax credits offered under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079;

The construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of improvements, fixtures, equipment, and facilities necessary or desirable for improvement of the real estate owned, used, or occupied by the approved company for manufacturing purposes. Construction activities include surveys; site tests and inspections; subsurface site work; excavation; removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions; filling, grading, and providing drainage and storm water retention; installation of utilities such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electric, communications, and similar facilities; off-site construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate; or similar activities as the authority may determine necessary for construction; and

The leasing of real estate and the buildings and fixtures thereon acquired, constructed, and installed with funds from grants under KRS 154.23-060;

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other legal entity engaged in manufacturing, or service or technology; however, any company whose primary purpose is retail sales shall not be an eligible company;

“Employee benefits” means nonmandated costs paid by an eligible company for its full-time employees for health insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, defined benefits, 401(k), or similar plans;

“Final approval” means action taken by the authority that authorizes the eligible company to receive inducements in connection with a project under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079;

“Full-time employee” means a person employed by an approved company for a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week and subject to the state income tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

“Inducements” means the assessment and the income tax credits allowed to an approved company under KRS 154.23-050 and 154.23-055;

“Local government” means a city, county, or urban-county government;

“Manufacturing” means to make, assemble, process, produce, or perform any other activity that changes the form or conditions of raw materials and other property, and shall include any ancillary activity to the manufacturing process, such as storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities; however, “manufacturing” shall not include mining, the extraction of minerals or coal, or processing of these resources;

“Person” means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, trust, unincorporated organization, association, corporation, limited liability company, institution, entity or government, whether federal, state, county, city, or otherwise, including without limitation any instrumentality, division, political subdivision, district, court, agency, or department thereof;

“Preliminary approval” means action taken by the authority that conditions final approval of an eligible company and its economic development project upon satisfaction by the eligible company of the applicable requirements under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079;

“Qualified employee” means an individual subject to Kentucky income tax who has resided in the qualified zone where the project exists for at least twelve (12) consecutive months preceding full-time employment by an approved company;

“Qualified statewide employee” means an individual subject to Kentucky income tax who has resided in any census tract or county in the Commonwealth that meets the criteria in KRS 154.23-015, regardless of whether the tract or county is in a qualified zone, for at least twelve (12) consecutive months preceding full-time employment by an approved company;

“Qualified zone” means any census tract or county certified as such by the authority in KRS 154.23-015 and 154.23-020;

“Rent” means:

The actual annual rent or leasing fee paid by an approved company to a bona fide entity negotiated at arm’s length for the use of a building by the approved company to conduct the approved project for which the inducement has been granted; or

The fair rental value on an annual basis in a building owned by the approved company of the space used by the approved company to conduct the approved project for which the inducement has been granted as determined by the authority using criteria that are customary in the real estate industry for the type of building being used. The fair rental value shall include an analysis of the cost of amortizing the cost of land and building over the period of time customary in the real estate industry for the type of building and for the land being utilized; and

Rent shall include the customary cost of occupancy, including but not limited to property taxes, heating and air conditioning, electricity, water, sewer, and insurance;

“Service and technology agreement” means any agreement entered into under KRS 154.23-040 on behalf of the authority, an approved company engaged in service or technology, and third-party lessors, if applicable, with respect to an economic development project;

“Service or technology” means either:
(23) (a)

“Service or technology” means either:

Any activity involving the performance of work, except work classified by the divisions, including successor divisions, of agriculture, forestry and fishing, mining, utilities, construction, manufacturing, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate rental and leasing, educational services, accommodation and food services, and public administration in accordance with the “North American Industry Classification System,” as revised by the United States Office of Management and Budget from time to time, or any successor publication; or

Regional or headquarters operations of an entity engaged in an activity listed in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, “service or technology” shall not include any activity involving the performance of work by an individual who is providing direct service to the public pursuant to a license issued by the state or an association that licenses in lieu of the state;

“Start-up costs” means the acquisition cost associated with the project and related to furnishing and equipping a building for ordinary business functions, including computers, nonrecurring costs of fixed telecommunication equipment, furnishings, office equipment, and the relocation of out-of-state equipment, as verified and approved by the authority in accordance with KRS 154.23-040;

“Tax incentive agreement” means that agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 154.23-035 between the authority and an approved company with respect to an economic development project;

“Kentucky gross receipts” means Kentucky gross receipts as defined in KRS 141.0401; and

“Kentucky gross profits” means Kentucky gross profits as defined in KRS 141.0401.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 25, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 149, § 217, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 211, § 71, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 46, effective June 28, 2006; 2007, ch. 137, § 44, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 39, effective June 25, 2009; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 44, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 146, § 21, effective June 27, 2019.

154.23-015.
Certification of qualified zones — Use of census tracts — Decertification of census tracts — Replacement of decertified noncontiguous tract with other qualifying census tract.

Upon written application by a county, urban-county government, or city of the first class, the authority shall certify one (1) to five (5) contiguous census tracts or a county certified by the authority in accordance with KRS 154.22-040 as a qualified zone. In the case of certification based on one (1) to five (5) contiguous census tracts, each census tract shall independently meet each of the following criteria, as verified by the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet:

A minimum total poverty rate of one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the United States poverty rate as determined by the most recent decennial census;

An unemployment rate that exceeds the statewide unemployment rate as determined on the basis of the most recent decennial census; and

A minimum population density of two hundred percent (200%) of the average Kentucky census tract population density as determined by the most recent decennial census.

Census tract information shall be based upon United States census data as set forth in the most recent edition of Census of Population and Housing: Population and Housing Characteristics for Census Tracts and Block Numbering Areas published by the United States Bureau of the Census.

The authority shall certify no more than one (1) qualified zone within each county of the Commonwealth, except in the case of a county certified under KRS 154.22-040, the entire county shall constitute the qualified zone.

A qualified zone shall commence on the date of certification by the authority and continue thereafter, except that at the time new decennial census data becomes available, the authority shall decertify any census tract that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (1) of this section for qualified zone status. The authority shall not give preliminary approval to any project in a decertified census tract. An approved company whose project is located in a decertified census tract shall not be eligible for the inducements offered by KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079, unless the tax incentive agreement or service and technology agreement is entered into by all parties prior to July 1 of the year following the calendar year in which the authority decertified that tract.

If decertification causes a formerly certified contiguous census tract to become noncontiguous, the applicant shall have the discretion to eliminate or maintain the noncontiguous tract. If the applicant eliminates the noncontiguous tract, it may replace the noncontiguous tract with another qualifying census tract, subject to approval of the authority.

A county, urban-county government, or city of the first class shall have no authority to request decertification of a census tract, and any addition of a census tract requested by a county, urban-county government, or city of the first class under KRS 154.23-020 shall be contiguous to a census tract that continues to meet the criteria under this section.

The authority shall pay its costs of counsel relating to zone certification.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 26, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 211, § 72, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 40, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 146, § 22, effective June 27, 2019.

154.23-020.
Amendment of boundaries of qualified zones.

When new decennial census data becomes available, a county, urban-county government, or city of the first class may apply in writing to the authority for amendment to the boundary of an existing qualified zone. A boundary change to an existing qualified zone shall not become effective until written approval has been granted by the authority.

A county, urban-county government, or city of the first class that applies to the authority to amend the boundary of an existing qualified zone shall certify in writing to the authority the following information:

Any census tract proposed for amendment is contiguous to the existing qualified zone;

The census tract proposed for amendment independently meets the population density, unemployment, and poverty requirements set forth in KRS 154.23-015 based on decennial census figures; and

The addition of the census tract or tracts proposed shall not enlarge the qualified zone to more than five (5) census tracts.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

154.23-025.
Standards for approval of companies and economic development projects — Commitments to be made by eligible companies.

Relevant standards for approval of eligible companies and economic development projects shall include but are not limited to creditworthiness of the eligible company, the number of new jobs to be provided by a project to Kentucky residents, and the likelihood that the project will be an economic success.

An eligible company shall certify to the authority by written application that it makes the following commitments in an economic development project:

A minimum investment of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the project;

Creation of a minimum of ten (10) new full-time jobs at the project site for qualified employees by the activation date, as set forth in KRS 154.23-035 or 154.23-040;

A statement that no significant number of existing jobs in the Commonwealth will be lost or adversely affected due to approval of the eligible company and its economic development project; and

A statement that the economic development project could reasonably and efficiently locate outside the qualified zone and, without the inducements offered by the authority, the eligible company would likely locate outside the zone.

No project that will result in the replacement of an existing manufacturing or service or technology facility existing in the Commonwealth shall be approved by the authority; however, the authority may approve a project if the project is one:
(3) (a)

No project that will result in the replacement of an existing manufacturing or service or technology facility existing in the Commonwealth shall be approved by the authority; however, the authority may approve a project if the project is one:

That rehabilitates a manufacturing or service or technology facility that has not been in operation;
1. a.

That rehabilitates a manufacturing or service or technology facility that has not been in operation;

For which the current occupant of the facility has published a notice of closure so long as the eligible company intending to acquire the facility is not an affiliate of the current occupant; or

To which the title is vested in one other than the eligible company and that is sold or transferred under a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or by order of bankruptcy court;

Replaces a manufacturing or service or technology facility existing in the Commonwealth that been damaged or destroyed by fire, or the title to which shall have been taken under the exercise of the power of eminent domain or is the subject of a nonappealable judgment that grants the power of eminent domain to the authority, in any of these events to the extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within twelve (12) months; or

Replaces an existing manufacturing or service or technology facility located in the same qualified zone that cannot be expanded due to the lack of available real estate at or adjacent to the manufacturing or service or technology facility to be replaced. Any economic development project satisfying the requirements of this paragraph shall only be eligible for inducements to the extent of the expansion, and no inducements shall be available for the equivalent of the manufacturing or service or technology facility to be replaced.

No economic development project otherwise satisfying the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be approved by the authority that results in a lease abandonment or lease termination by the approved company without the consent of the lessor.

Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:
(4) (a)

Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the Commonwealth; or

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the county in which the project is to be undertaken.

If the base hourly wage calculated in paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection is less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage, then the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage. However, for projects receiving preliminary approval of the authority prior to July 1, 2008, the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage existing on January 1, 2007. In addition to the applicable base hourly wage calculated above, the eligible company shall provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage; however, if the eligible company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage, the eligible company may qualify under this section if it provides the employees hired by the eligible company as a result of the economic development project total hourly compensation equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the applicable base hourly wage through increased hourly wages combined with employee benefits.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 27, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 69, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

154.23-030.
Preliminary approval of eligible companies — Designation of approved companies.

With respect to each eligible company that applies to the authority for inducements, and with respect to the project described in its application, the authority shall request materials and make all inquiries concerning the application the authority deems necessary. Upon review of the application and requested materials, and completion of initial inquiries, the authority may, by resolution of the board of directors, grant preliminary approval to the eligible company. The authority shall approve a report describing the economic development project, that shall set out as follows:

The name, qualified zone location, business, and standard industrial classification of the eligible company;

The nature of the economic development project;

The use and projected amounts of the inducements to be available to the eligible company by year; and

Other information as the authority may require.

After preliminary approval, the authority may, by resolution of its board of directors, designate an eligible company to be an approved company, and execute a tax incentive agreement between the approved company and the authority.

Within a one (1) year period following preliminary approval of an eligible company engaged in service or technology activities with respect to its economic development project, the authority may designate the eligible company as an approved company and execute a service and technology agreement among the approved company, the authority, and lessors, if applicable. If final approval of an eligible company does not occur within the one (1) year period as provided in this subsection, then the eligible company’s request for designation and project authorization shall be considered denied.

The decision to grant an eligible company the status of an approved company shall be solely that of the authority, which shall base its decision upon consideration of all information provided.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 28, effective July 15, 2002.

154.23-035.
Tax incentive agreements between authority and approved companies — Time limits — Tax credits and assessments as inducements for approved companies — Assignment of tax incentive agreement — Documentation of expenditures — Suspension of inducements — Authority’s remedies in case of failure to comply — Activation date — Costs of counsel.

The authority, upon adoption of an authorizing resolution, may enter into a tax incentive agreement with any approved company engaged in manufacturing activities with respect to its economic development project. The terms and provisions of each tax incentive agreement, including the amount of approved costs, shall be determined by negotiations between the authority and the approved company, subject to the inclusion of the following mandatory provisions:

The tax incentive agreement shall set forth the maximum amount of inducements available to the approved company for recovery of the approved costs authorized by the authority and expended by the approved company.

The approved company shall expend the authorized approved costs within three (3) years of the date of the final approval by the authority.

The approved company shall provide the authority with documentation as to the expenditures for approved costs in a manner acceptable to the authority.

The term of the tax incentive agreement shall commence upon the activation date and will terminate upon the earlier of the full receipt of the maximum amount of inducements by the approved company or ten (10) years after the activation date.

The tax incentive agreement shall include the activation date, which shall be a date selected by the approved company within two (2) years of the date of final approval by the authority of the tax incentive agreement. If the approved company does not satisfy the minimum investment and minimum employment requirements of KRS 154.23-025 by the activation date, the approved company shall not be entitled to receive inducements pursuant to this subchapter until the approved company satisfies the requirements; however, the ten (10) year period for the term of the tax incentive agreement shall begin from the activation date. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, if the approved company does not satisfy the minimum investment and minimum employment requirements of KRS 154.23-025 within two (2) years from the date of final approval of the tax incentive agreement, then the approved company shall be ineligible to receive inducements under this subchapter unless an extension is approved by the authority.

The approved company shall comply with the hourly wage criteria set forth in KRS 154.23-025(4) and provide documentation in connection with hourly wages paid to its full-time employees hired as a result of the economic development project in a manner acceptable to the authority.

The approved company may be permitted the following inducements during the term of the tax incentive agreement:

A one hundred percent (100%) credit against the Kentucky income tax and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401 that would otherwise be owed in the approved company’s fiscal year, as determined under KRS 141.401, to the Commonwealth by the approved company on the income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts of the approved company generated by or arising from the economic development project. The ordering of the credits shall be as provided in KRS 141.0205; and

The aggregate assessments withheld by the approved company each year.

The total inducements may not exceed authorized cumulative approved costs paid by the approved company in the three (3) year period commencing with and after the date of final approval.

The tax credited to the approved company shall be credited for the fiscal year for which the tax return of the approved company is filed. The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated income tax payments under KRS 141.044 on the Kentucky taxable income, Kentucky gross receipts or Kentucky gross profits generated by or arising from the economic development project.

The tax incentive agreement may be assigned by the approved company only upon the prior written consent of the authority following the adoption of a resolution by the authority to that effect.

The tax incentive agreement shall provide that if the total number of full-time qualified employees at the site of the economic development project is less than ten (10), the authorized inducements shall be suspended for a period of up to one (1) year. If the company does not have at least ten (10) new full-time qualified employees at the site within one (1) year from the date of the initial suspension, the inducements may be terminated at the discretion of the authority.

The tax incentive agreement shall provide that if an approved company fails to comply with its obligations under the tax incentive agreement then the authority shall have the right, at its option, to:

Suspend the tax credits and assessments available to the approved company, pursuant to subsection (11) of this section;

Pursue any remedy provided under the tax incentive agreement, including termination thereof; and

Pursue any other remedy at law to which it may be entitled.

All remedies provided in subsection (12) of this section shall be deemed to be cumulative.

The approved company shall pay all costs of counsel to the authority resulting from approval of its economic development project.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 29, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 47, effective June 28, 2006; 2019 ch. 151, § 65, effective June 27, 2019.

154.23-040.
Service and technology agreements — Time limits for meeting minimum investment and employment requirements — Inducements during term of agreements — Suspension or termination of inducements — Approved costs — Reduction of inducements.

Before any approved company engaged in service or technology activity is granted inducements under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079, a service and technology agreement with respect to the approved company’s economic development project shall be entered into between the authority and the approved company. The terms and provisions of the service and technology agreement, including the amount of approved costs, shall be determined by negotiations between the authority and the approved company, subject to inclusion of the following mandatory provisions:

The term of the service and technology agreement shall commence upon the activation date and shall terminate upon the earlier of the full receipt of the maximum amount of inducements by the approved company or ten (10) years after the activation date.

The service and technology agreement shall include the activation date, which shall be a date selected by the approved company within two (2) years of the date of final approval by the authority of the service and technology agreement. If the approved company does not satisfy the minimum investment and minimum employment requirements of KRS 154.23-025 by the activation date, the approved company shall not be entitled to receive inducements pursuant to this subchapter until the approved company satisfies the requirements; however, the ten (10) year period for the term of the service and technology agreement shall begin from the activation date. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, if the approved company does not satisfy the minimum investment and minimum employment requirements of KRS 154.23-025 within two (2) years from the date of final approval of the service and technology agreement, then the approved company shall be ineligible to receive inducements under this subchapter unless an extension is approved by the authority.

In order to implement the activation date, the approved company shall notify the authority, the Kentucky Department of Revenue, the qualified statewide employees, and the affected local jurisdictions, if any, of the activation date on which implementation of the inducements authorized in the service and technology agreement shall occur;

The approved company may be permitted the following inducements during the term of the service and technology agreement:

A tax credit of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Kentucky income tax liability imposed by KRS 141.020, 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 that would otherwise be due, determined under KRS 141.401, on the income, Kentucky gross receipts, or Kentucky gross profits of the approved company generated by or arising out of the economic development project, as limited by the provisions of this section and KRS 154.23-045. The ordering of the credits shall be as provided in KRS 141.0205; and

The assessment, if applicable, withheld by the approved company in each year;

The inducements allowed to the approved company shall be subtracted from the approved cost balance in the fiscal year of the approved company for which the tax return of the approved company is filed;

If the total number of full-time qualified employees at the site of the economic development project is less than ten (10) or, in the case of an existing business, the approved company fails to maintain the increase of at least ten (10) full-time qualified employees, the authorized inducements shall be suspended for a period of up to one (1) year. If the company does not have at least ten (10) new full-time qualified employees at the site within one (1) year from the date of the initial suspension, the inducements may be terminated at the discretion of the authority;

The service and technology agreement may be assigned by the approved company only upon the prior written consent of the authority; and

The approved company shall pay all costs of counsel to the authority resulting from approval of its economic development project.

Before the end of the first year following the activation date, the authority shall, using data supplied by the approved company, verify and determine the total start-up costs for the approved company’s economic development project. The initial approved costs shall be up to a maximum of fifty percent (50%) of the start-up costs.

Each year, during the ten (10) year term of the service and technology agreement, up to fifty percent (50%) of the annualized rent shall be added to the unrecouped balance of approved costs, and the inducements earned shall be subtracted from the approved costs.

If, in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the service and technology agreement is in effect, the accumulated inducements equal the unrecouped remaining balance of the approved costs then expended, the assessments collected from the wages of the employees shall cease for the remainder of that fiscal year of the approved company, and the approved company shall resume normal personal income tax and occupational license fee withholdings from the qualified statewide employees’ wages for the remainder of that fiscal year.

If, in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the service and technology agreement is in effect, the total of the income tax credit granted to the approved company plus the assessment collected from the wages of the qualified statewide employees exceeds the remaining balance of the approved costs then expended, the approved company shall pay the excess to the Commonwealth as income tax.

If, in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the service and technology agreement is in effect, the assessment collected from the wages of the qualified statewide employees exceeds the unrecouped remaining balance of the approved costs then expended, the assessment collected from the wages of the qualified statewide employees shall cease for the remainder of that fiscal year of the approved company, the approved company shall resume normal personal income tax and occupational license fee withholdings from the qualified statewide employees for the remainder of that fiscal year, and the approved company shall remit to the Commonwealth and applicable local jurisdictions their respective shares of the excess assessment collected on the withholding filing date for qualified statewide employees’ wages next succeeding the first date when the approved company collected excess assessments.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 105, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 578, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 48, effective June 28, 2006.